en: Screen/Display design: Display protector; Picture; Rotating; Touch; Viewfinder; Other
tr: Ekran/Ekran tasarımı: Ekran koruyucusu; Resim; Dönen; Dokunma; Vizör; Diğer
ru: Конструкция экрана/дисплея: Защитная экрана; Изображение; Вращающийся; Сенсорный; Видоискатель; Другое
th: การออกแบบหน้าจอ/จอแสดงผล: ตัวป้องกันหน้าจอ; รูปภาพ; การหมุน; สัมผัส; Viewfinder; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 屏幕/显示屏设计: 显示屏保护膜; 图片; 旋转; 触碰; 取景器; 其他
sk-SK: Dizajn obrazovky/displeja: Ochrana displeja; Obrázok; Otáčanie; Dotykový; Hľadáčik; Iné
ja: 画面/ディスプレイのデザイン: ディスプレイ保護シート; 画像; 回転式; タッチ; ファインダー; その他
cs: Design obrazovky/displeje: Chránič displeje; Obrázkový; Rotační; Dotykový; Hledáček; Jiné
pl: Konstrukcja ekranu/wyświetlacza: Ochraniacz wyświetlaczy; Obraz; Obracanie; Dotyk; Wizjer; Inne
sl-SI: Dizajn zaslona/prikaza: Zaščita zaslona; Slika; Vrtenje; Dotik; Iskalo; Drugo
nl: Scherm-/displayontwerp: Schermbeschermer; Afbeelding; Roterend; Aanraken; Zoeker; Andere
zh-TW: 螢幕/顯示器設計: 顯示器保護膜; 圖片; 旋轉; 觸碰; 取景器; 其他
fr: Conception d’écran/affichage: Affichage de protection; Image; Rotation; Intéractif; Viseur; Autre
fi: Näyttöruudun/näytön muotoilu: Näytön suoja; Kuva; Pyörivä; Kosketus; Etsin; Muu
nb: Skjerm/displaydesign: Skjermbeskytter; Bilde; Roterende; Berøring; Visningssøker; Annet
it: Design dello schermo/display: Protezione schermo; Immagini; Rotante; Touch; Viewfinder; Altro
vi: Thiết kế màn hình/hiển thị: Thiết bị bảo vệ màn hình; Hình ảnh; Xoay; Chạm; Kính ngắm; Khác
hu: Képernyő/kijelző kialakítása: Kijelzővédő; Kép; Forgó; Érintés; Kereső; Egyéb
lt-LT: Ekrano / monitoriaus dizainas: Ekrano apsauga; Paveikslėlis; Sukamasis; Jutiklinis; Vaizdo ieškiklis; Kita
sv: Skärm-/displaydesign: Displayskydd; Bild; Roterande; Touch; Viewfinder; Övrigt
es: Diseño de pantalla: Protector de pantalla; Imagen; Giratorio; Táctil; Visor; Otros
da: Skærm/displaydesign: Displaybeskytter; Billede; Roterende; Berøring; Viewfinder; Andet
hr-HR: Dizajn ekrana/zaslona: Zaštita zaslona; Slika; Rotirajući; Dodir; Tražilo; Ostalo
ro-RO: Design ecran/afișaj: Protector pentru afișaj; Imagine; Rotativ; Tactil; Vizor; Altele
ko: 스크린/디스플레이 디자인: 디스플레이 보호기; 그림; 회전; 터치; 뷰파인더; 기타
bg-BG: Дизайн на екрана/дисплея: Протектор за дисплея; Снимка; Въртящ се; Сензорен; Визьор; Други
pt-BR: Design de tela/exibição: Protetor de tela; Imagem; Giratório; Toque; Visor; Outro
pt-PT: Design do ecrã/visor: Protetor de ecrã; Imagem; Giratório; Tátil; Viewfinder; Outro
el: Σχεδιασμός οθόνης: Προστατευτικό οθόνης; Εικόνα; Περιστροφική; Επαφή; Σκόπευτρο; Άλλο
de: Bildschirmdesign: Displayschützer; Bild; Drehbar; Touch; Sucher; Sonstiges